Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Part 1

General Provisions

42-5-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Municipal Airport Act.”

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 24; T.C.A., § 42-301.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 42-301 — 42-310 (Acts 1931, ch. 74, §§ 1-9; 1931, ch. 116, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 2726.10-2726.19; Williams, §§ 2726.13-2726.22) were repealed by Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 23.

Cross-References. Authority to regulate passenger transportation services, title 7, ch. 51, part 10.

Contracts and mutual aid agreements, §6-54-601.

Financial assistance rendered by department to municipal airports, §42-2-203.

Loans for airports, title 4, ch. 31, part 6.

Mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 1 Tenn. Juris., Airplanes and Airports, § 1.

Law Reviews.

Torts — Liability of Insured Municipality and Its Airport Lessee, 24 Tenn. L. Rev. 272.

Comparative Legislation. County and municipal airports:

Ala. Code §4-4-1 et seq.

Ark. Code §14-359-101 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. §6-3-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 183.132 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. §61-5-1 et seq.

Mo. Rev. Stat. § 305.300 et seq.

N.C. Gen. Stat. § 63-1 et seq.

Va. Code § 5.1-31 et seq.

Collateral References. 8 Am. Jur. 2d Aviation § 55 et seq.

2A C.J.S. Aeronautics and Aerospace §§ 20, 62, 64; 63 C.J.S. Municipal Corporations §§ 1058, 1059.

Liability of municipality for torts in connection with airport. 66 A.L.R.2d 634.

Liability of owner or operator of airport in connection with furnishing rescue equipment or services. 34 A.L.R.3d 1449.

Power to establish or maintain public airport. 161 A.L.R. 733.

Aviation
8, 9.

42-5-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Air navigation facility” means any facility, other than one owned and operated by the United States, used in, available for use in, or designed for use in, aid of air navigation, including any structures, mechanisms, lights, beacons, markers, communicating systems, or other instrumentalities, or devices used or useful as an aid, or constituting an advantage or convenience, to the safe taking off, navigation, and landing of aircraft, or the safe and efficient operation or maintenance of an airport, and combination of any or all of such facilities;

“Airport” means any area of land or water that is used, or intended for use, for the landing and take-off of aircraft, and any appurtenant areas that are used, or intended for use, for airport buildings or other airport facilities or avigation easements, or rights-of-way, together with all airport buildings and facilities located thereon;

“Airport hazard” means any structure, object of natural growth, or use of land that obstructs the airspace required for the flight of aircraft in landing or taking off at an airport or is otherwise hazardous to such landing or taking off of aircraft;

“Avigation easement” means any easement that includes all or any part of the following: the right to unobstructed and unrestricted flight of aircraft, in, through, and across the airspace over and above certain described land, beginning at the altitude or height above the surface of the land as determined by the municipality; the right to enter upon certain described land for the purpose of removing and preventing any use of the land or the construction or erection of any buildings, structures, or facilities, and the growth of any trees or objects upon the real estate over, above and across the certain described land, other than those uses, buildings, structures, facilities, growths of trees or objects expressly excepted; and the right to prevent the use of the land by any assembly of persons or the use of the land in such a manner as might attract or bring together an assembly of persons thereon;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of transportation;

“Department” means the department of transportation;

“Municipal” means pertaining to a municipality as defined in this section;

“Municipality” means any county, incorporated city, or incorporated town of this state; and

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or body politic; and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee or other similar representative thereof.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 1; 1977, ch. 471, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-302; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 17.

42-5-103. Establishment of airports and air navigation facilities — Operation — Land acquisition.

Every municipality is authorized, out of any appropriations or other moneys made available for such purposes, to plan, establish, develop, construct, enlarge, improve, maintain, equip, operate, regulate, protect and police airports and air navigation facilities, either within or without the territorial limits of such municipality and within or without the territorial boundaries of this state, including the construction, installation, equipment, maintenance and operation at such airports of buildings and other facilities for the servicing of aircraft or for the comfort and accommodation of air travelers, and the purchase and sale of supplies, goods and commodities as an incident to the operation of its airport properties. For such purposes, the municipality may use any available property that it may now or hereafter own or control and may, by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, acquire property, real or personal, or any interest therein, including avigation easements and easements in airport hazards or land outside the boundaries of an airport or airport site, as are necessary to permit safe and efficient operation of the airport or to permit the removal, elimination, obstruction-marking or obstruction-lighting of airport hazards or to prevent the establishment of airport hazards.

If the land for a proposed or planned airport is located outside the corporate limits of a municipality, then the municipality shall also gain approval from the county commission of the county where the land is located before proceeding with the acquisition of such land by eminent domain.

Subdivision (b)(1) shall not apply to any airport that has scheduled air passenger service and a control tower in existence or under construction upon April 27, 1995.

Subdivision (b)(1) shall not be applicable to renovations, expansions or future renovations or expansions of airports in existence on January 1, 1995; provided, that the property to be used for the renovations or expansions is currently owned by the airport or is contiguous or adjacent to property currently owned by the airport.

Subdivision (b)(1) shall apply to any airport not actually under construction on or before January 1, 1995.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-303; Acts 1995, ch. 148, §§ 1-4.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of 1995 amendment, OAG 95-078 (7/24/95).

42-5-104. Acquisition of existing airports.

The municipality may by purchase, gift, devise, lease, eminent domain proceedings or otherwise, acquire existing airports and air navigation facilities; provided, that it shall not acquire or take over any airport or air navigation facility owned or controlled by another municipality or public agency of this or any other state without the consent of the municipality or public agency.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-304.

42-5-105. Establishment of airports on public waters and reclaimed lands.

For the purposes of this chapter, a municipality may establish or acquire and maintain, within or bordering upon the territorial limits of the municipality, airports in, over and upon any public waters of this state, any submerged lands under such public waters, and any artificial or reclaimed lands that before the artificial making or reclamation thereof constituted a portion of the submerged lands under public waters; and may construct and maintain terminal buildings, landing floats, causeways, roadways, and bridges for approaches to or connecting with any such airport, and landing floats and breakwaters for the protection of any such airport.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-305.

Collateral References.

Prescriptive right-of-way for aircraft. 17 A.L.R.2d 1041.

42-5-106. Limitation on design and operation of air navigation facilities.

All air navigation facilities established or operated by municipalities shall be supplementary to and coordinated in design and operation with those established and operated by the federal and state governments.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-306.

42-5-107. Public purpose of airports.

Any airport so acquired, owned, leased, controlled or occupied by municipalities shall be and is declared to be acquired, owned, leased, controlled or occupied for a public purpose.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-307.

42-5-108. Eminent domain.

In the acquisition of property by eminent domain proceedings authorized by this chapter, the municipality shall proceed in the manner provided by title 29, chapter 16. For the purpose of making surveys and examinations relative to any eminent domain proceedings, it is lawful to enter upon any land, doing no unnecessary damage.

Notwithstanding any other statute or of any applicable municipal charter, the municipality may take possession of any property to be acquired by eminent domain proceedings at any time after the commencement of the proceedings.

The municipality shall not be precluded from abandoning eminent domain proceedings in any case where possession of the property has not been taken, even after a trial jury in circuit court has rendered a verdict as to damages for the property taken by the proceedings and at any time prior to the entry of a final decree disposing of the entire eminent domain proceedings.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 3; T.C.A., § 42-308.

42-5-109. Disposal of airport property.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement pursuant to §42-5-119, every municipality may, by sale, lease or otherwise, dispose of any airport, air navigation facility or other property, or portion thereof or interest therein, acquired pursuant to this chapter, subject, however, to any contractual obligations with respect thereto. Disposal by sale, lease or otherwise shall be in accordance with the laws of this state, or provisions of the charter of the municipality, governing the disposition of other property of the municipality, except that in the case of disposal to another municipality or agency of the state or federal government for aeronautical purposes incident thereto, the sale, lease or other disposal may be effected in such manner and upon such terms as the governing body of the municipality may deem in the best interest of the municipality.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 4; 1961, ch. 322, § 1; T.C.A., § 42-309.

42-5-110. Operation and use privileges.

Municipal Operation.

In operating an airport or air navigation facility owned, leased or controlled by a municipality, the municipality may, except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement pursuant to § 42-5-119, enter into contracts, leases, agreements, grants or other arrangements for a term not exceeding fifty (50) years, with any person or persons, either exclusively or in common with others; provided, that the public is not deprived of its rightful use of the airport or facility:

Granting the privilege of using or improving the airport or air navigation facility, including buildings or structures or any portion or facility thereof, relating thereto, or real property acquired or set aside for such purposes, or space therein for commercial purposes, establishing the charges, rentals or fees at a fixed or variable rate binding upon the parties thereto for the full term of the contracts, leases, agreements, grants or other arrangements;

Conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, things, services or facilities at the airport or air navigation facility;

Making available services to be furnished by the municipality or its agents at the airport or air navigation facility; and

Determining the charges, rentals or fees for the use of any properties under its control, and the charges for any services or accommodations, and the terms and conditions under which the properties may be used, except that any such charges, rentals and fees as may be fixed or determined by any contract, lease, agreement, grant or other arrangement or privileges, uses, services, accommodations or concessions to which the municipality is a party or is the grantor, shall, if expressly provided therein, be binding upon all parties thereto for the full term prescribed therein unless the term is sooner modified or terminated by mutual consent of the parties to such agreement.

In each case, the municipality may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals or fees for the privileges, uses or services, use of buildings or structures that are reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service and are established with due regard to the property and improvements used and the expenses of operation to the municipality.

Other Operation. Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan or agreement pursuant to § 42-5-119, a municipality may by contract, lease or other arrangement, upon a consideration fixed by it, grant to any qualified person for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years, the privilege of operating, as agent of the municipality or otherwise, any airport owned or controlled by the municipality; provided, that the airport shall be operated as a public airport and that the person shall not enter into any contracts, leases or other arrangements in connection with the operation of the airport that the municipality might not have undertaken under subsection (a).

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 5; T.C.A., § 42-310.

42-5-111. Liens.

To enforce the payment of any charges for repairs or improvements to, or storage or care of, any personal property made or furnished by the municipality or its agents in connection with the operation of an airport or air navigation facility owned or operated by the municipality, the municipality shall have liens on the property that are enforceable by the municipality as provided by §66-21-101.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 6; T.C.A., § 42-311.

42-5-112. Delegation of authority to airport officer or board.

Any authority vested by this chapter in a municipality or in the governing body thereof, for the planning, establishment, development, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, regulation, protection and policing of airports or other air navigation facilities established, owned or controlled, or to be established, owned or controlled by the municipality, may be vested by resolution of the governing body of the municipality in an officer or board or other municipal agency whose powers and duties shall be prescribed in the resolution; provided, that the expense of planning, establishment, development, construction, enlargement, improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, regulation, protection and policing shall be a responsibility of the municipality. Any officer or board or other municipal agency that, pursuant to §§42-5-101 —42-5-110, formerly §§ 42-301 — 42-310, inclusive, as enacted by Acts 1955, ch. 6, prior to the repeal of those sections by Acts 1957, ch. 375, has, by municipal resolution or ordinance, been delegated such authority as in this section provided, has all power and authority as is authorized by this chapter for such officer or board or municipal agency.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 7; T.C.A., § 42-312.

42-5-113. Regulations and jurisdiction — Scope — Conformity to federal and state law.

A municipality that has established or acquired, or that may hereafter establish or acquire, an airport or air navigation facility, is authorized to adopt, amend and repeal such reasonable ordinances, resolutions, rules and regulations and orders as it shall deem necessary for the management, government and use of the airport or air navigation facility under its control, whether situated within or without the territorial limits of the municipality. For the enforcement thereof, the municipality may, by ordinance or resolution, as may by law be appropriate, appoint airport guards or police, with full police powers and fix penalties, within the limits prescribed by law, for the violation of the ordinances, resolutions, rules, regulations and orders. These penalties shall be enforced in the same manner in which penalties prescribed by other ordinances or resolutions of the municipality are enforced.

To the extent that an airport or other air navigation facility controlled or operated by a municipality pursuant to any arrangement, understanding, or agreement created or entered into pursuant to this chapter, the Metropolitan Airport Authority Act, compiled in chapter 4 of this title, or any other statutory provisions, is located outside the territorial limits of the municipality, it shall, subject to federal and state laws, rules, and regulations, be under the jurisdiction and control of the municipality controlling or operating it. Any vocation, occupation, business or business activity located or conducted upon the premises, grounds and/or property of any such airport or other air navigation facility shall be subject to being taxed both by any municipality or county in which the airport or other air navigation facility is actually located and by any municipality controlling or operating the airport or air navigation facility to the extent and in the manner provided by law.

not less than nor more than

100,000 200,000

450,000 550,000

600,001

according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Subdivision (a)(2) does not apply to counties having a population of between two hundred eighty-five thousand (285,000) and two hundred ninety thousand (290,000), according to the 1980 federal census.

Subdivision (a)(2) does not apply to any county having a population of:

Subdivision (a)(2) does not apply to any county having a metropolitan form of government.

Subdivision (a)(2) does not apply to any municipality or county creating, controlling, or operating, in part, an airport or air navigation facility created, controlled, or operated, in part, by at least four (4) political subdivisions of this state and a political subdivision of an adjacent state, which airport is located outside the territorial limits of the municipality or county.

No ordinance, resolution, rule, regulation or order adopted by a municipality pursuant to this chapter shall be inconsistent with, or contrary to, any act of the Congress of the United States, or laws of this state, or to any regulations promulgated or standards established pursuant thereto.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 8; T.C.A., § 42-313; Acts 1983, ch. 466, §§ 1, 4-7.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

42-5-114. Appropriations and taxation.

The governing body of any municipality having power to appropriate and raise money is authorized to appropriate and to raise by taxation or otherwise sufficient moneys to carry out the provisions and purposes of this chapter.

Regardless of any limitation by general or special law or charter as to the amount or total of taxes that may be levied, taxes may be levied by the governing body of a municipality for the purposes of this chapter in excess of any such limitation; provided, that such amount in excess of the limitation is authorized by an ordinance or resolution referred to and approved by a majority of the voters of the municipality voting in an election to approve or disapprove the ordinance or resolution.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to require or to have required an election to authorize the levy of ad valorem taxes, without limitation of rate or amount, for the payment of the principal of and interest on bonds or other obligations of a municipality issued for any of the purposes listed in § 42-5-115 when the provisions of any other section or chapter of this code, or any other general or special law or charter, under the authority of which such bonds or other obligations are or were issued, and the proceedings authorizing the issuance of such bonds taken pursuant thereto, provide for the levy of taxes, without limitation of rate or amount, for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds or other obligations.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 9; 1961, ch. 322, § 2; T.C.A., § 42-314.

42-5-115. Bond issues — Notes — Financing acquisition costs and improvements.

The cost of planning, acquiring, establishing, developing, constructing, enlarging, improving, maintaining or equipping an airport or air navigation facility, or the site therefor, including buildings, structures and other facilities incidental to the operation thereof or relating thereto, the acquisition of avigation easements, and the acquisition or elimination of airport hazards, may be paid for wholly or partly from the proceeds of the sale of bonds or other obligations of the municipality, as the governing body of the municipality shall determine. The bonds or other obligations may be issued by a county in accordance with title 5, chapter 11 [repealed] and by an incorporated city or incorporated town in accordance with title 7, chapter 36 [repealed]; provided, that any landing fees, concession fees, rents, charges, or any other revenues derived from the operation of an airport, pledged as security for the bonds, that are fixed and established by the provisions of a lease or contract, shall not be subject to revision or change during the term of such lease or contract except in the manner provided in the lease or contract.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 10; 1961, ch. 322, § 3; T.C.A., § 42-315.

Compiler's Notes. Title 5, ch. 11, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 3.

Title 7, ch. 36, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 22.

Cross-References. Bonds and notes issued by local governments, title 9, ch. 21.

Central business improvement districts, authority to issue bonds, §§7-84-105,7-84-505,7-84-518.

Collateral References.

Exclusiveness of method prescribed by statute or ordinance for enforcement of special assessment for public improvement or service. 88 A.L.R.2d 1250.

42-5-116. Validation of prior acquisitions, actions and bond issues.

Any acquisition of property previously made, within or without the limits of any municipality or the state, for the purposes authorized by this chapter, and any other action previously taken by a municipality in furtherance of those purposes, including, but not limited to, the making of appropriations, the expenditure of money, the incurring of debts, the acceptance and disbursement of federal, state or other grants or loans, the issuance and payment of bonds and notes, the execution of leases and contracts, which acquisition or action would have been authorized had this chapter been in effect at the time of the acquisition or action, is ratified and made valid.

All bonds and notes previously issued in furtherance of purposes authorized by this chapter and actions ratified by this section are confirmed as legal obligations of the municipality, and, without prejudice to the general powers granted to the municipality by this chapter, the municipality is authorized to issue further bonds and notes for such purposes up to the limit fixed in the original authorization therefor, which bonds and notes shall be legal obligations in accordance with their terms.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 11; T.C.A., § 42-316.

Cross-References. Bond issues validated, §42-5-117.

42-5-117. Bond issues ratified and validated — Bonding power supplemental.

All bonds issued prior to March 17, 1961, and all proceedings taken by any municipality of this state prior to March 17, 1961, to authorize the issuance of bonds for airport purposes of whatsoever nature, including, but not limited to, the cost of planning, acquiring, establishing, developing, constructing, enlarging, improving, maintaining or equipping an airport or air navigation facility, or the site therefor, including the buildings, structures and other facilities incidental to the operation thereof or relating thereto, the acquisition of avigation easements and the acquisition or elimination of airport hazards, are ratified, validated and confirmed, and such bonds are declared to be valid and legally binding obligations payable in accordance with their terms, notwithstanding any lack of power of the governing body of the municipality to authorize and issue the bonds and provide for the payment thereof in the manner stated in the bonds and in the proceedings authorizing their issuance, and notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any such proceedings or the failure of any such proceedings to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter known as the “Municipal Airport Act,” or with any of the provisions of any other section or chapter of this code or any other general or special law or charter. The power to issue bonds for airport purposes of whatsoever nature, conferred by this chapter, is declared to have been and to be, and shall be, in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other section or chapter of this code or any other general or special law or charter, and none of the provisions of this chapter shall be deemed to have affected, or shall affect, the powers conferred by any other section or chapter of this code or any other general or special law or charter to issue bonds for airport purposes of whatsoever nature, and this chapter shall not be construed to have been, or to be, in substitution for the powers conferred by any other section or chapter of this code or any other general or special law or charter.

Acts 1961, ch. 322, § 6; T.C.A., § 42-331.

Collateral References.

Exclusiveness of method prescribed by statute or ordinance for enforcement of special assessment for public improvement or service. 88 A.L.R.2d 1250.

42-5-118. Application of airport revenues and sale proceeds.

The revenues obtained by a municipality from the ownership, control or operation of any airport or air navigation facility, including proceeds from the sale of any airport or portion thereof or air navigation facility property, may, subject to any contractual obligations with respect thereto, be used by a municipality for any municipal purpose, and any use thereof made prior to March 17, 1961, for any municipal purpose is ratified, validated and confirmed.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 12; 1961, ch. 322, § 4; T.C.A., § 42-317.

42-5-119. Federal and state aid.

Acceptance Authorized; Conditions. Except as otherwise provided by law, every municipality is authorized to accept, receive, receipt for, disburse and expend federal and state moneys and other moneys, public or private, made available by grant or loan or both to accomplish in whole or in part any of the purposes of this chapter. All federal moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the municipality upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the United States and as are consistent with state law; and all state moneys accepted under this section shall be accepted and expended by the municipality upon such terms and conditions as are prescribed by the state. Unless otherwise prescribed by the agency from which such moneys were received and except as otherwise provided by law, the chief financial officer of the municipality shall, on its behalf, deposit all moneys received pursuant to this section and shall keep them in separate funds designated according to the purposes for which the moneys were made available, in trust for such purposes.

Department as Agent for Municipalities in Receiving Certain Federal Funds; Exceptions.

The department shall act as agent for each municipality for the purposes of applying for, receiving and disbursing federal funds made available pursuant to the former Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970, 84 Stat. 219, 49 U.S.C., § 1701 et seq. [repealed], or any amendment thereto, unless the municipality owns an airport having a minimum of twenty-five thousand (25,000) originating enplanements annually on regularly scheduled airline carriers as certified by the federal civil aeronautics board, in which event the municipality may act as principal with respect to any airport owned by it, or may designate the department as its agent for such purposes. All funds received by the department shall be deposited in the state treasury to be kept and disbursed in a manner consistent with federal requirements.

Whenever the department acts as agent, it may do so for an individual municipality or municipalities acting jointly and the applicable provisions of § 42-2-203(c) shall apply under either circumstance.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 13; 1977, ch. 200, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 42-318.

Compiler's Notes. The Airport and Airway Development Act of 1970, 84 Stat. 219, 49 U.S.C. 1970 ed. § 1701 et seq., referred to in this section, was repealed in 1982.

Cross-References. Audits of municipalities receiving state aid, §42-2-222.

Department of transportation as agent for municipalities in receiving certain federal funds, §42-2-223.

42-5-120. Contracts.

A municipality may enter into any contracts necessary to the execution of the powers granted it, and for the purposes provided by this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 14; T.C.A., § 42-319.

42-5-121. Mutual aid.

If any municipality determines that the public interest and the interests of the municipality will be served by assisting any other municipality or municipalities in exercising the powers and authority granted by this chapter, the municipality may furnish assistance by gift of real or personal property, or lease or loan thereof with or without charge or interest. In appropriating property or money and providing for assistance by taxation, the issuance of bonds, or other means, the municipality may exercise all of its powers as though used for its own direct purposes as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 15; T.C.A., § 42-320.

42-5-122. Public purpose — County and municipal purpose.

The acquisition of any land or interest in land pursuant to this chapter, the planning, acquisition, establishment, development, construction, improvement, maintenance, equipment, operation, regulation, protection, and policing of airports and air navigation facilities, including the acquisition of avigation easements or the acquisition or elimination of airport hazards, and the exercise of any other powers granted by this chapter to municipalities and other public agencies, to be severally or jointly exercised, are declared to be public and governmental functions, exercised for a public purpose, and matters of public necessity, and in the case of any county, are declared to be county functions and purposes as well as public and governmental, and in the case of any municipality, other than a county, are declared to be municipal functions and purposes as well as public and governmental.

All land and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of any municipality or other public agency in the manner and for the purposes enumerated in this chapter shall and are declared to be acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity, and, in the case of a county or municipality, for county or municipal purposes, respectively.

No action or suit shall be brought or maintained against any municipality, or its officers, agents, servants or employees, in or about the construction, maintenance, operation, superintendence, or management of any municipal airport.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any action, suit, or proceeding by or on behalf of any holder of bonds of a municipality previously or hereafter issued for airport purposes of whatever nature, pursuant to this chapter, or pursuant to any other section or chapter of this code, or any other general or special law or charter.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 17; 1961, ch. 322, § 5; T.C.A., § 42-326.

42-5-123. Airport property and income exempt from taxation.

Any property in this state acquired by a municipality for airport purposes pursuant to this chapter, and any income derived by such municipality from the ownership, operation or control of that property, shall be exempt from taxation to the same extent as other property used for public purposes. Any municipality is authorized to exempt from municipal taxation any property, acquired within its boundaries by a public agency of another state for airport purposes, and any income derived from such property, to the extent that the other state authorizes similar exemptions from taxation to municipalities of this state.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 18; T.C.A., § 42-327.

42-5-124. Supplementary authority.

In addition to the general and special powers conferred by this chapter, every municipality is authorized to exercise such powers as are necessarily incidental to the exercise of such general and special powers.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 19; T.C.A., § 42-328.

42-5-125. Airport zoning authority unaffected.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to limit any right, power or authority of a municipality to regulate airport hazards by zoning.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 20; T.C.A., § 42-329.

42-5-126. Interpretation and construction.

This chapter shall be so interpreted and construed as to make uniform as far as possible the laws and regulations of this state and other states and of the government of the United States having to do with the subject of municipal airports.

Acts 1957, ch. 375, § 21; T.C.A., § 42-330.